Nevada, session 83, SB419-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department shall notify each regulatory body of this
State that has issued a current, valid license to a licensed provider
or insurer if:
(a) The Department determines that the licensed provider or
insurer is not in compliance with the requirements of subsection 4
of NRS 439.589; and
(b) The licensed provider or insurer:
(1) Is not exempt from those requirements pursuant to
subsection 5 of NRS 439.589; and
(2) Has not received a waiver of those requirements
pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 439.589.
2. If the Department determines that a licensed provider or
insurer for which notice was previously provided pursuant to
subsection 1 has come into compliance with the requirements of
subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the Department shall immediately
notify the regulatory body that issued the license.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “License” means any license, certificate, registration,
permit or similar type of authorization to practice an occupation
or profession or engage in a business in this State issued to a
licensed provider or insurer.
(b) “Licensed provider or insurer” means:
(1) A medical facility licensed pursuant to chapter 449 of
NRS;
(2) The holder of a permit to operate an ambulance, an air
ambulance or a vehicle of a fire-fighting agency pursuant to
chapter 450B of NRS;
(3) A provider of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031,
who is licensed pursuant to title 54 of NRS; or
(4) Any person licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS.
(c) “Regulatory body” means any governmental entity that
issues a license.
Sec. 2. NRS 439.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.580 1. Any local health officer or a deputy of a local
health officer who neglects or fails to enforce the provisions of this
chapter in his or her jurisdiction, or neglects or refuses to perform
any of the duties imposed upon him or her by this chapter or by the
instructions and directions of the Division shall be punished by a
fine of not more than $250.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 5 –
2. [Each] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 439.589, each
person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or refuses
or neglects to obey any lawful order, rule or regulation of the:
(a) State Board of Health or violates any rule or regulation
approved by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 439.350,
439.366, 439.410 and 439.460; or
(b) Director adopted pursuant to NRS 439.538 or 439.581 to
439.595, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. NRS 439.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.581 As used in NRS 439.581 to 439.595, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 439.582 to 439.585, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. NRS 439.587 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.587 1. The Director is the state authority for health
information technology. [The Director shall:
(a) Ensure that a health information exchange complies with the
specifications and protocols for exchanging electronic health
records, health-related information and related data prescribed
pursuant to the provisions of the Health Information Technology for
Economic and Clinical Health Act of 2009, 42 U.S.C. §§ 300jj et
seq. and 17901 et seq., and other applicable federal and state law;
(b) Encourage the use of a health information exchange by
health care providers, payers and patients;
(c) Prescribe by regulation standards for the electronic
transmittal of electronic health records, prescriptions, health-related
information, electronic signatures and requirements for electronic
equivalents of written entries or written approvals in accordance
with federal law;
(d) Prescribe by regulation rules governing the ownership,
management and use of electronic health records, health-related
information and related data retained or shared by a health
information exchange; and
(e) Prescribe by regulation, in consultation with the State Board
of Pharmacy, standards for the electronic transmission of prior
authorizations for prescription medication using a health
information exchange.]
2. The Director may establish or contract with [not more than]
one or more health information [exchange to serve as the statewide
health information exchange] exchanges to be responsible for
compiling statewide master indexes of patients, health care
providers and payers. The Director may by regulation prescribe the
requirements for such a [statewide] health information exchange,
including, without limitation, the procedure by which any patient,
-
*SB419_R2*

– 6 –
health care provider or payer master index created pursuant to any
contract is transferred to the State upon termination of the contract.
3. The Director may enter into contracts, apply for and accept
available gifts, grants and donations, and adopt such regulations as
are necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 439.581 to
439.595, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. NRS 439.588 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.588 1. A health information exchange shall not operate
in this State without first obtaining certification as provided in
subsection 2.
2. The Director shall by regulation establish the manner in
which a health information exchange may apply for certification and
the requirements for granting such certification, which must include,
without limitation, that the health information exchange demonstrate
its financial and operational sustainability, adherence to the privacy,
security and patient consent standards adopted pursuant to NRS
439.589 and capacity for interoperability with any other health
information exchange certified pursuant to this section.
3. The Director may deny an application for certification or
may suspend or revoke any certification issued pursuant to
subsection 2 for failure to comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.595, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto or any applicable federal or
state law.
4. When the Director intends to deny, suspend or revoke a
certification, he or she shall give reasonable notice to all parties by
certified mail. The notice must contain the legal authority,
jurisdiction and reasons for the action to be taken. A health
information exchange that wishes to contest the action of the
Director must file an appeal with the Director.
5. The Director shall adopt regulations establishing the manner
in which a person may file a complaint with the Director regarding a
violation of the provisions of this section.
6. The Director may impose an administrative fine against a
health information exchange which operates in this State without
holding a certification in an amount established by the Director by
regulation. The Director shall afford a health information exchange
so fined an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 233B.121.
7. The Director may adopt such regulations as he or she
determines are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 6. NRS 439.589 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.589 1. The Director , in consultation with health care
providers, third parties and other interested persons and entities,
-
*SB419_R2*

– 7 –
shall by regulation prescribe a framework for the electronic
maintenance, transmittal and exchange of electronic health
records, prescriptions, health-related information and electronic
signatures and requirements for electronic equivalents of written
entries or written approvals in accordance with federal law. The
regulations must:
(a) Establish standards [:
(a)] for networks and technologies to be used to maintain,
transmit and exchange health information, including, without
limitation, standards:
(1) That require:
(I) The use of networks and technologies that allow
patients to access electronic health records directly from the
health care provider of the patient and forward such electronic
health records electronically to other persons and entities; and
(II) The interoperability of such networks and
technologies in accordance with the applicable standards for the
interoperability of Qualified Health Information Networks
prescribed by the Office of the National Coordinator for Health
Information Technology of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services;
(2) To ensure that electronic health records retained or shared
[by any health information exchange] are secure;
[(b)] (3) To maintain the confidentiality of electronic health
records and health-related information, including, without
limitation, standards to maintain the confidentiality of electronic
health records relating to a child who has received health care
services without the consent of a parent or guardian and which
ensure that a child’s right to access such health care services is not
impaired;
[(c)] (4) To ensure the privacy of individually identifiable
health information, including, without limitation, standards to
ensure the privacy of information relating to a child who has
received health care services without the consent of a parent or
guardian;
[(d)] (5) For obtaining consent from a patient before retrieving
the patient’s health records from a health information exchange,
including, without limitation, standards for obtaining such consent
from a child who has received health care services without the
consent of a parent or guardian;
[(e)] (6) For making any necessary corrections to information or
records [retained or shared by a health information exchange; and
(f)] ;
-
*SB419_R2*

– 8 –
(7) For notifying a patient if the confidentiality of
information contained in an electronic health record of the patient is
breached [.] ;
(8) Governing the ownership, management and use of
electronic health records, health-related information and related
data; and
(9) For the electronic transmission of prior authorizations
for prescription medication;
(b) Ensure compliance with the requirements, specifications
and protocols for exchanging, securing and disclosing electronic
health records, health-related information and related data
prescribed pursuant to the provisions of the Health Information
Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, 42 U.S.C. §§
300jj et seq. and 17901 et seq., the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and other
applicable federal and state law; and
(c) Be based on nationally recognized best practices for
maintaining, transmitting and exchanging health information
electronically.
2. The standards prescribed pursuant to this section must
include, without limitation:
(a) Requirements for the creation, maintenance and transmittal
of electronic health records;
(b) Requirements for protecting confidentiality, including
control over, access to and the collection, organization and
maintenance of electronic health records, health-related information
and individually identifiable health information;
(c) Requirements for the manner in which a patient may,
through a health care provider who participates in the sharing of
health records using a health information exchange, revoke his or
her consent for a health care provider to retrieve the patient’s health
records from the health information exchange;
(d) A secure and traceable electronic audit system for
identifying access points and trails to electronic health records and
health information exchanges; and
(e) Any other requirements necessary to comply with all
applicable federal laws relating to electronic health records, health-
related information, health information exchanges and the security
and confidentiality of such records and exchanges.
3. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section must not
require any person or entity to use a health information exchange.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7, the
Department and the divisions thereof, other state and local
governmental entities, health care providers, third parties,
pharmacy benefit managers and other entities licensed or certified
-
*SB419_R2*

– 9 –
pursuant to title 57 of NRS shall maintain, transmit and exchange
health information in accordance with the regulations adopted
pursuant to this section, the provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.595,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act, and any other regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
5. The Federal Government and employees thereof, a
provider of health coverage for federal employees, a provider of
health coverage that is subject to the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., or a Taft-Hartley
trust formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5) is not required to
but may maintain, transmit and exchange electronic information
in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this
section.
6. A health care provider may apply to the Department for a
waiver from the provisions of subsection 4 on the basis that the
health care provider does not have the infrastructure necessary to
comply with those provisions, including, without limitation,
because the health care provider does not have access to the
Internet. The Department shall grant a waiver if it determines
that:
(a) The health care provider does not currently have the
infrastructure necessary to comply with the provisions of
subsection 4; and
(b) Obtaining such infrastructure is not reasonably
practicable, including, without limitation, because the cost of such
infrastructure would make it difficult for the health care provider
to continue to operate.
7. The provisions of subsection 4 do not apply to the
Department of Corrections.
8. A violation of the provisions of this section or any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto is not a misdemeanor.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
(b) “Third party” means any insurer, governmental entity or
other organization providing health coverage or benefits in
accordance with state or federal law.
Sec. 6.5. NRS 439.591 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.591 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of
NRS 439.538, a patient must not be required to participate in a
health information exchange. Before a patient’s health care records
may be retrieved from a health information exchange, the patient
must be fully informed and affirmatively consent, in the manner
prescribed by the Director. It is the public policy of this State that,
except as otherwise provided in NRS 439.538, a patient’s health
-
*SB419_R2*

– 10 –
care records must not be retrieved from a health information
exchange unless the patient provides such affirmative consent.
2. A patient must be notified in the manner prescribed by the
Director of any breach of the confidentiality of electronic health
records of the patient or a health information exchange.
3. A patient who consents to the retrieval of his or her
electronic health record from a health information exchange may at
any time request that a health care provider access and provide the
patient with his or her electronic health record in accordance with
the provisions of 45 C.F.R. § 164.526.
Sec. 7. NRS 439.593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.593 A health care provider who with reasonable care
transmits, accesses, utilizes, discloses, relies upon or provides to a
patient an apparently genuine electronic health record accessed
[from a health information exchange to make a decision concerning
the provision of health care to a patient] in accordance with NRS
439.581 to 439.595, inclusive, and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto is immune from civil or criminal liability for [the]
any decision concerning the provision of health care to the patient
and any civil or criminal liability resulting from the provision of
the record to a patient if:
1. The electronic health record is inaccurate;
2. The inaccuracy was not caused by the health care provider;
3. The inaccuracy resulted in an inappropriate health care
decision; and
4. The health care decision was appropriate based upon the
information contained in the inaccurate electronic health record.
Sec. 8. NRS 439.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.595 Providing information to , transmitting, accessing,
utilizing or disclosing an electronic health record or participating in
a health information exchange in accordance with NRS 439.581 to
439.595, inclusive, does not constitute an unfair trade practice
pursuant to chapter 598A or 686A of NRS.
Sec. 9. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Division receives notification from the Department
of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 1 of this act
that a medical facility licensed pursuant to this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589,
the Division may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, require corrective
action or impose an administrative penalty in the amount
prescribed by NRS 449.163.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 11 –
2. The Division shall not suspend or revoke a license for
failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 4 of
NRS 439.589.
Sec. 10. NRS 449.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.029 As used in NRS 449.029 to 449.240, inclusive, and
section 9 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, “medical
facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0151 and
includes a program of hospice care described in NRS 449.196.
Sec. 11. NRS 449.0301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0301 The provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and section 9 of this act do not apply to:
1. Any facility conducted by and for the adherents of any
church or religious denomination for the purpose of providing
facilities for the care and treatment of the sick who depend solely
upon spiritual means through prayer for healing in the practice of
the religion of the church or denomination, except that such a
facility shall comply with all regulations relative to sanitation and
safety applicable to other facilities of a similar category.
2. Foster homes as defined in NRS 424.014.
3. Any medical facility, facility for the dependent or facility
which is otherwise required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is operated and
maintained by the United States Government or an agency thereof.
Sec. 12. NRS 449.0302 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0302 1. The Board shall adopt:
(a) Licensing standards for each class of medical facility or
facility for the dependent covered by NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and section 9 of this act and for programs of hospice
care.
(b) Regulations governing the licensing of such facilities and
programs.
(c) Regulations governing the procedure and standards for
granting an extension of the time for which a natural person may
provide certain care in his or her home without being considered a
residential facility for groups pursuant to NRS 449.017. The
regulations must require that such grants are effective only if made
in writing.
(d) Regulations establishing a procedure for the indemnification
by the Division, from the amount of any surety bond or other
obligation filed or deposited by a facility for refractive surgery
pursuant to NRS 449.068 or 449.069, of a patient of the facility who
has sustained any damages as a result of the bankruptcy of or any
breach of contract by the facility.
(e) Regulations that prescribe the specific types of
discrimination prohibited by NRS 449.101.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 12 –
(f) Regulations requiring a hospital or independent center for
emergency medical care to provide training to each employee who
provides care to victims of sexual assault or attempted sexual assault
concerning appropriate care for such persons, including, without
limitation, training concerning the requirements of NRS 449.1885.
(g) Any other regulations as it deems necessary or convenient to
carry out the provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive [.] ,
and section 9 of this act.
2. The Board shall adopt separate regulations governing the
licensing and operation of:
(a) Facilities for the care of adults during the day; and
(b) Residential facilities for groups,
 which provide care to persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other
severe dementia, as described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 449.1845.
3. The Board shall adopt separate regulations for:
(a) The licensure of rural hospitals which take into consideration
the unique problems of operating such a facility in a rural area.
(b) The licensure of facilities for refractive surgery which take
into consideration the unique factors of operating such a facility.
(c) The licensure of mobile units which take into consideration
the unique factors of operating a facility that is not in a fixed
location.
4. The Board shall require that the practices and policies of
each medical facility or facility for the dependent provide
adequately for the protection of the health, safety and physical,
moral and mental well-being of each person accommodated in the
facility.
5. In addition to the training requirements prescribed pursuant
to NRS 449.093, the Board shall establish minimum qualifications
for administrators and employees of residential facilities for groups.
In establishing the qualifications, the Board shall consider the
related standards set by nationally recognized organizations which
accredit such facilities.
6. The Board shall adopt separate regulations regarding the
assistance which may be given pursuant to NRS 453.375 and
454.213 to an ultimate user of controlled substances or dangerous
drugs by employees of residential facilities for groups. The
regulations must require at least the following conditions before
such assistance may be given:
(a) The ultimate user’s physical and mental condition is stable
and is following a predictable course.
(b) The amount of the medication prescribed is at a maintenance
level and does not require a daily assessment.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 13 –
(c) A written plan of care by a physician or registered nurse has
been established that:
(1) Addresses possession and assistance in the administration
of the medication; and
(2) Includes a plan, which has been prepared under the
supervision of a registered nurse or licensed pharmacist, for
emergency intervention if an adverse condition results.
(d) Except as otherwise authorized by the regulations adopted
pursuant to NRS 449.0304, the prescribed medication is not
administered by injection or intravenously.
(e) The employee has successfully completed training and
examination approved by the Division regarding the authorized
manner of assistance.
7. The Board shall adopt separate regulations governing the
licensing and operation of residential facilities for groups which
provide assisted living services. The Board shall not allow the
licensing of a facility as a residential facility for groups which
provides assisted living services and a residential facility for groups
shall not claim that it provides “assisted living services” unless:
(a) Before authorizing a person to move into the facility, the
facility makes a full written disclosure to the person regarding what
services of personalized care will be available to the person and the
amount that will be charged for those services throughout the
resident’s stay at the facility.
(b) The residents of the facility reside in their own living units
which:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, contain
toilet facilities;
(2) Contain a sleeping area or bedroom; and
(3) Are shared with another occupant only upon consent of
both occupants.
(c) The facility provides personalized care to the residents of the
facility and the general approach to operating the facility
incorporates these core principles:
(1) The facility is designed to create a residential
environment that actively supports and promotes each resident’s
quality of life and right to privacy;
(2) The facility is committed to offering high-quality
supportive services that are developed by the facility in
collaboration with the resident to meet the resident’s individual
needs;
(3) The facility provides a variety of creative and innovative
services that emphasize the particular needs of each individual
resident and the resident’s personal choice of lifestyle;
-
*SB419_R2*

– 14 –
(4) The operation of the facility and its interaction with its
residents supports, to the maximum extent possible, each resident’s
need for autonomy and the right to make decisions regarding his or
her own life;
(5) The operation of the facility is designed to foster a social
climate that allows the resident to develop and maintain personal
relationships with fellow residents and with persons in the general
community;
(6) The facility is designed to minimize and is operated in a
manner which minimizes the need for its residents to move out of
the facility as their respective physical and mental conditions change
over time; and
(7) The facility is operated in such a manner as to foster a
culture that provides a high-quality environment for the residents,
their families, the staff, any volunteers and the community at large.
8. The Division may grant an exception from the requirement
of subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 7 to a facility
which is licensed as a residential facility for groups on or before
July 1, 2005, and which is authorized to have 10 or fewer beds and
was originally constructed as a single-family dwelling if the
Division finds that:
(a) Strict application of that requirement would result in
economic hardship to the facility requesting the exception; and
(b) The exception, if granted, would not:
(1) Cause substantial detriment to the health or welfare of
any resident of the facility;
(2) Result in more than two residents sharing a toilet facility;
or
(3) Otherwise impair substantially the purpose of that
requirement.
9. The Board shall, if it determines necessary, adopt
regulations and requirements to ensure that each residential facility
for groups and its staff are prepared to respond to an emergency,
including, without limitation:
(a) The adoption of plans to respond to a natural disaster and
other types of emergency situations, including, without limitation,
an emergency involving fire;
(b) The adoption of plans to provide for the evacuation of a
residential facility for groups in an emergency, including, without
limitation, plans to ensure that nonambulatory patients may be
evacuated;
(c) Educating the residents of residential facilities for groups
concerning the plans adopted pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b); and
-
*SB419_R2*

– 15 –
(d) Posting the plans or a summary of the plans adopted
pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) in a conspicuous place in each
residential facility for groups.
10. The regulations governing the licensing and operation of
facilities for transitional living for released offenders must provide
for the licensure of at least three different types of facilities,
including, without limitation:
(a) Facilities that only provide a housing and living
environment;
(b) Facilities that provide or arrange for the provision of
supportive services for residents of the facility to assist the residents
with reintegration into the community, in addition to providing a
housing and living environment; and
(c) Facilities that provide or arrange for the provision of
programs for alcohol and other substance use disorders, in addition
to providing a housing and living environment and providing or
arranging for the provision of other supportive services.
 The regulations must provide that if a facility was originally
constructed as a single-family dwelling, the facility must not be
authorized for more than eight beds.
11. The Board shall adopt regulations applicable to providers
of community-based living arrangement services which:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), require a
natural person responsible for the operation of a provider of
community-based living arrangement services and each employee of
a provider of community-based living arrangement services who
supervises or provides support to recipients of community-based
living arrangement services to complete training concerning the
provision of community-based living arrangement services to
persons with mental illness and continuing education concerning the
particular population served by the provider;
(b) Exempt a person licensed or certified pursuant to title 54 of
NRS from the requirements prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a) if
the Board determines that the person is required to receive training
and continuing education substantially equivalent to that prescribed
pursuant to that paragraph;
(c) Require a natural person responsible for the operation of a
provider of community-based living arrangement services to receive
training concerning the provisions of title 53 of NRS applicable to
the provision of community-based living arrangement services; and
(d) Require an applicant for a license to provide community-
based living arrangement services to post a surety bond in an
amount equal to the operating expenses of the applicant for 2
months, place that amount in escrow or take another action
prescribed by the Division to ensure that, if the applicant becomes
-
*SB419_R2*

– 16 –
insolvent, recipients of community-based living arrangement
services from the applicant may continue to receive community-
based living arrangement services for 2 months at the expense of the
applicant.
12. The Board shall adopt separate regulations governing the
licensing and operation of freestanding birthing centers. Such
regulations must:
(a) Align with the standards established by the American
Association of Birth Centers, or its successor organization, the
accrediting body of the Commission for the Accreditation of Birth
Centers, or its successor organization, or another nationally
recognized organization for accrediting freestanding birthing
centers; and
(b) Allow the provision of supervised training to providers of
health care, as appropriate, at a freestanding birthing center.
13. As used in this section, “living unit” means an individual
private accommodation designated for a resident within the facility.
Sec. 13. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 9 of
this act upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive, and
section 9 of this act, or of any other law of this State or of the
standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or as provided in any regulation adopted
pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, and section 9 of
this act, and 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of
NRS if such approval is required.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
-
*SB419_R2*

– 17 –
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to subsection
2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of adults
during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 14. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.410 or
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 9 of this act or any
condition, standard or regulation adopted by the Board, the
Division, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 449.165, may:
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
-
*SB419_R2*

– 18 –
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000
per day for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not
to exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
3. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
section 9 of this act or any condition, standard or regulation adopted
by the Board to make any improvements necessary to correct the
violation.
4. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 must be accounted for separately and
used to administer and carry out the provisions of NRS 449.001 to
449.430, inclusive, and section 9 of this act, 449.435 to 449.531,
inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS to protect the health, safety,
well-being and property of the patients and residents of facilities in
accordance with applicable state and federal standards or for any
other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. NRS 449.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.240 The district attorney of the county in which the facility
is located shall, upon application by the Division, institute and
conduct the prosecution of any action for violation of any provisions
of NRS 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive [.] , and section 9 of this act.
Sec. 17. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the health authority receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 1
of this act that the holder of a permit to operate an ambulance, air
-
*SB419_R2*

– 19 –
ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting agency is not in
compliance with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589,
the health authority may, after notice and the opportunity for a
hearing in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, require
corrective action or impose an administrative penalty in an
amount established by regulation of the board.
2. The health authority shall not suspend or revoke a permit
for failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 4 of
NRS 439.589.
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 26. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 39 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
-
*SB419_R2*

– 20 –
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 28. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
-
*SB419_R2*

– 21 –
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.595,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408,
687B.723, 687B.725, 689B.030 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.265,
689B.287 and 689B.500 apply to coverage provided pursuant to this
paragraph, except that the provisions of NRS 689B.0378,
689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage for active officers
and employees of the governing body, or the dependents of such
officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
-
*SB419_R2*

– 22 –
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 29. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.595, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, 686A.135,
687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.723, 687B.725, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177,
695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive,
-
*SB419_R2*

– 23 –
and 695G.405, in the same manner as an insurer that is licensed
pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to comply with those
provisions.
Sec. 30. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 31. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 32. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 33. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 35. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 36. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 37. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 38. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the
public policy of this State that each resident of this State who
otherwise qualifies for enrollment in Medicaid, regardless of his
or her immigration or citizenship status, is eligible to receive the
benefits provided for by subsection 2.
2. The Director shall apply to the Secretary of Health and
Human Services for any federal authority necessary to provide
coverage under the Children’s Health Insurance Program for the
costs of prenatal care and labor and delivery for persons who:
(a) Are not eligible for coverage under the State Plan for
Medicaid because of their immigration status; and
(b) Would otherwise be eligible for Medicaid.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Cooperate with the Federal Government in obtaining any
federal authority pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) If the Federal Government provides the authority
necessary to provide the coverage described in subsection 2, take
any measures necessary to provide such coverage; and
(c) Implement the provisions of subsection 2 only to the extent
authorized by the Federal Government.
4. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Department shall:
(a) Compile a report of the following information for each of
the 2 immediately preceding fiscal years:
(1) The number of recipients of coverage provided pursuant
to subsection 2 by region and county;
(2) The demographics of the recipients described in
subparagraph (1), including, without limitation, race, ethnicity,
primary language, gender identity or expression and age;
-
*SB419_R2*

– 24 –
(3) An overview of the categories of services received by the
recipients described in subparagraph (1), including, without
limitation, primary care and specialty care;
(4) An estimate of the costs saved through the provision of
coverage pursuant to subsection 2, including, without limitation,
costs saved through:
(I) Avoiding visits to an emergency room; and
(II) Federal financial participation; and
(5) Any other data relevant to guide or provide information
concerning the implementation of the provisions of this section;
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services; and
(c) Post the report on an Internet website maintained by the
Department.
Sec. 40. Chapter 422A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 41 and 42 of this act.
Sec. 41. 1. The Medicaid Outreach Advisory Committee is
hereby established within the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services.
2. The Advisory Committee consists of such members as are
appointed by the Administrator. The members appointed by the
Administrator must be persons with experience conducting
outreach to persons described in subsection 1 of section 42 of this
act.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the members
of the Advisory Committee must be appointed to terms of 4 years.
The terms must be staggered in such a manner that, to the extent
possible, the terms of one-half of the members will expire every 2
years. The initial members of the Advisory Committee shall, at the
first meeting of the board after their appointment, draw lots to
determine which members will initially serve terms of 2 years and
which will serve terms of 4 years. A member of the Advisory
Committee may be reappointed.
4. A vacancy in the membership of the Advisory Committee
must be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment.
5. The members of the Advisory Committee serve without
compensation and are not entitled to the per diem and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
6. Each member of the Advisory Committee who is an officer
or employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State
must be relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular
compensation so that the officer or employee may prepare for and
attend meetings of the Advisory Committee and perform any work
necessary to carry out the duties of the Advisory Committee in the
-
*SB419_R2*

– 25 –
most timely manner practicable. A state agency or political
subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or employee
who is a member of the Advisory Committee to make up the time
the officer or employee is absent from work to carry out duties as a
member of the Advisory Committee or use annual leave or
compensatory time for the absence.
7. The Division shall provide such administrative support to
the Advisory Committee as is necessary to carry out the duties of
the Advisory Committee.
8. The Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Annually elect a Chair from among its members; and
(b) Meet at least once every 3 months at the times and places
specified by a call of the Chair and may meet at such further times
as deemed necessary by the Chair.
9. A majority of the voting members of the Advisory
Committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business,
and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the
Advisory Committee is required to take action.
Sec. 42. 1. The Medicaid Outreach Advisory Committee
created by section 41 of this act shall advise the Department, the
Division of Health Care Financing and Policy and the Division of
Welfare and Supportive Services concerning outreach to, and
maximizing enrollment in Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program of, members of marginalized or underserved
communities, including, without limitation:
(a) Racial and ethnic minorities;
(b) Persons who reside in rural areas;
(c) Persons with disabilities;
(d) Persons with mental illness;
(e) Persons with substance use disorders;
(f) Persons experiencing homelessness; and
(g) Parents or guardians of children who are persons
described in paragraphs (a) to (f), inclusive.
2. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Advisory Committee shall compile a report of its activities during
the immediately preceding biennium and post the report on an
Internet website maintained by the Division.
Sec. 43. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 44. NRS 603A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.100 1. The provisions of NRS 603A.010 to 603A.290,
inclusive, do not apply to the maintenance or transmittal of
information in accordance with NRS 439.581 to 439.595, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 26 –
2. A data collector who is also an operator, as defined in NRS
603A.330, shall comply with the provisions of NRS 603A.300 to
603A.360, inclusive.
3. Any waiver of the provisions of NRS 603A.010 to
603A.290, inclusive, is contrary to public policy, void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 45. NRS 629.051 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.051 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
in regulations adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS
652.135 with regard to the records of a medical laboratory and
unless a longer period is provided by federal law, each custodian of
health care records shall retain the health care records of patients as
part of the regularly maintained records of the custodian for 5 years
after their receipt or production. Health care records may be retained
in written form, or by microfilm or any other recognized form of
size reduction, including, without limitation, microfiche, computer
disc, magnetic tape and optical disc, which does not adversely affect
their use for the purposes of NRS 629.061. Health care records
[may] :
(a) Must, except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and 6
of NRS 439.589, be created, maintained, transmitted and
exchanged electronically as required by subsection 4 of NRS
439.589; and
(b) May be created, authenticated and stored in a [computer
system] health information exchange which meets the
requirements of NRS 439.581 to 439.595, inclusive, and section 1
of this act, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. A provider of health care shall post, in a conspicuous place
in each location at which the provider of health care performs health
care services, a sign which discloses to patients that their health care
records may be destroyed after the period set forth in subsection 1.
3. When a provider of health care performs health care services
for a patient for the first time, the provider of health care shall
deliver to the patient a written statement which discloses to the
patient that the health care records of the patient may be destroyed
after the period set forth in subsection 1.
4. If a provider of health care fails to deliver the written
statement to the patient pursuant to subsection 3, the provider of
health care shall deliver to the patient the written statement
described in subsection 3 when the provider of health care next
performs health care services for the patient.
5. In addition to delivering a written statement pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4, a provider of health care may deliver such a
written statement to a patient at any other time.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 27 –
6. A written statement delivered to a patient pursuant to this
section may be included with other written information delivered to
the patient by a provider of health care.
7. A custodian of health care records shall not destroy the
health care records of a person who is less than 23 years of age on
the date of the proposed destruction of the records. The health care
records of a person who has attained the age of 23 years may be
destroyed in accordance with this section for those records which
have been retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period
provided by federal law.
8. If a health care licensing board receives notification from
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
section 1 of this act that a provider of health care to which the
health care licensing board has issued a license is not in
compliance with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589,
the health care licensing board may, after notice and the
opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of this
title, require corrective action or impose an administrative penalty
in an amount not to exceed the maximum penalty that the health
care licensing board is authorized to impose for other violations.
The health care licensing board shall not suspend or revoke a
license for failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 4
of NRS 439.589.
9. The provisions of this section , except for the provisions of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and subsection 8, do not apply to a
pharmacist.
[9.] 10. The State Board of Health shall adopt:
(a) Regulations prescribing the form, size, contents and
placement of the signs and written statements required pursuant to
this section; and
(b) Any other regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631,
632, 633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B,
640C, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS.
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) The State Board of Health with respect to licenses
issued pursuant to chapter 640D or 640E of NRS.
(b) “License” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 1 of
this act.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 28 –
Sec. 46. NRS 654.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
654.190 1. The Board may, after notice and an opportunity
for a hearing as required by law, impose an administrative fine of
not more than $10,000 for each violation on, recover reasonable
investigative fees and costs incurred from, suspend, revoke, deny
the issuance or renewal of or place conditions on the license of, and
place on probation or impose any combination of the foregoing on
any licensee who:
(a) Is convicted of a felony relating to the practice of
administering a nursing facility or residential facility or of any
offense involving moral turpitude.
(b) Has obtained his or her license by the use of fraud or deceit.
(c) Violates any of the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Aids or abets any person in the violation of any of the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 9 of
this act, as those provisions pertain to a facility for skilled nursing,
facility for intermediate care or residential facility for groups.
(e) Violates any regulation of the Board prescribing additional
standards of conduct for licensees, including, without limitation, a
code of ethics.
(f) Engages in conduct that violates the trust of a patient or
resident or exploits the relationship between the licensee and the
patient or resident for the financial or other gain of the licensee.
2. If a licensee requests a hearing pursuant to subsection 1, the
Board shall give the licensee written notice of a hearing pursuant to
NRS 233B.121 and 241.034. A licensee may waive, in writing, his
or her right to attend the hearing.
3. The Board may compel the attendance of witnesses or the
production of documents or objects by subpoena. The Board may
adopt regulations that set forth a procedure pursuant to which the
Chair of the Board may issue subpoenas on behalf of the Board.
Any person who is subpoenaed pursuant to this subsection may
request the Board to modify the terms of the subpoena or grant
additional time for compliance.
4. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
5. The expiration of a license by operation of law or by order
or decision of the Board or a court, or the voluntary surrender of a
license, does not deprive the Board of jurisdiction to proceed with
any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the
licensee or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.
Sec. 47. Chapter 680A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Commissioner receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 1
-
*SB419_R2*

– 29 –
of this act that an insurer is not in compliance with the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the Commissioner
may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing in accordance
with the provisions of this title, require corrective action or impose
an administrative fine in the amount prescribed by NRS 680A.200.
2. The Commissioner shall not suspend or revoke the
certificate of authority of an insurer for failure to comply with the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589.
Sec. 48. NRS 680A.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680A.095 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
an insurer which is not authorized to transact insurance in this State
may not transact reinsurance with a domestic insurer in this State,
by mail or otherwise, unless the insurer holds a certificate of
authority as a reinsurer in accordance with the provisions of NRS
680A.010 to 680A.150, inclusive, 680A.160 to 680A.280, inclusive,
and section 47 of this act, 680A.320 and 680A.330.
2. To qualify for authority only to transact reinsurance, an
insurer must meet the same requirements for capital and surplus as
are imposed on an insurer which is authorized to transact insurance
in this State.
3. This section does not apply to the joint reinsurance of title
insurance risks or to reciprocal insurance authorized pursuant to
chapter 694B of NRS.
Sec. 49. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 50. Chapter 683A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Commissioner receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 1
of this act that an administrator is not in compliance with the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the Commissioner
may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter, require corrective action or
impose an administrative fine in the amount prescribed by
NRS 683A.461.
2. The Commissioner shall not suspend or revoke the
certificate of registration of an administrator for failure to comply
with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589.
Sec. 51. NRS 683A.3683 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.3683 A producer of limited lines travel insurance and
each travel retailer, or employee or authorized representative of a
travel retailer, who offers or disseminates travel insurance under the
license of a producer of limited lines travel insurance shall be
subject to the provisions of NRS 683A.451 to 683A.520, inclusive,
and section 50 of this act and chapter 686A of NRS.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 30 –
Sec. 52. NRS 692A.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
692A.270 The provisions of NRS 683A.321, 683A.331,
683A.341, 683A.400, 683A.451 to 683A.490, inclusive, and section
50 of this act and 683A.520 apply to title insurers, title agents and
escrow officers.
Sec. 53. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Commissioner receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 1
of this act that a health maintenance organization is not in
compliance with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589,
the Commissioner may, after notice and the opportunity for a
hearing in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, require
corrective action or impose an administrative fine in the amount
prescribed by NRS 695C.350.
2. The Commissioner shall not suspend or revoke the
certificate of authority of a health maintenance organization for
failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 4 of
NRS 439.589.
Sec. 54. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 54.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 54.6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 55. NRS 719.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
719.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
provisions of this chapter apply to electronic records and electronic
signatures relating to a transaction.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a transaction
to the extent it is governed by:
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, a law
governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils or
testamentary trusts;
(b) The Uniform Commercial Code other than NRS 104.1306,
104.2101 to 104.2725, inclusive, and 104A.2101 to 104A.2532,
inclusive; or
(c) The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.595, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. The provisions of this chapter apply to an electronic record
or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of
this chapter under subsection 2 to the extent it is governed by a law
other than those specified in subsection 2.
4. A transaction subject to the provisions of this chapter is also
subject to other applicable substantive law.
Sec. 56. NRS 720.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
720.140 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the provisions of this chapter apply to any transaction for which a
-
*SB419_R2*

– 31 –
digital signature is used to sign an electronic record. The provisions
of this chapter do not apply to a digital signature that is used to sign
an electronic health record in accordance with NRS 439.581 to
439.595, inclusive, and section 1 of this act and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
2. As used in this section, “electronic record” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 719.090.
Sec. 57. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy
of the Department of Health and Human Services for the purposes
of providing the coverage under the Children’s Health Insurance
Program required by section 39 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $224,927
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 ............................... $1,485,480
2. Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated by
subsection 1 remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must
not be committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective
fiscal years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any
entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 58. 1. During the 2023-2024 interim, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services shall study:
(a) The feasibility of including in the State Plan for Medicaid
coverage of digital health products, including, without limitation:
(1) Remote patient monitoring;
(2) Health products that use artificial intelligence;
(3) Digital therapeutics; and
(4) Health information technology;
(b) Procedures for providing the coverage described in
paragraph (a), including, without limitation, procedures and criteria
for determining whether a digital health product is suitable for
coverage;
(c) Any waivers of federal law necessary to obtain federal
financial participation in the provision of the coverage described in
paragraph (a); and
(d) The estimated potential costs of providing the coverage
described in paragraph (a).
2. On or before February 1, 2025, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services shall submit a report of
-
*SB419_R2*

– 32 –
its findings and any recommendations for legislation to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 83rd Session
of the Legislature.
3. As used in this section, “digital therapeutic” means a
product, device, Internet application or other technology that uses
software primarily to prevent, manage or treat a medical condition,
disease or disorder.
Sec. 58.5. 1. During the 2023-2024 interim, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services shall study:
(a) The feasibility of creating a natural persons index for this
State and the steps necessary to create such an index. The study
must include, without limitation, an analysis of the capabilities of
providers of health care in this State concerning the exchange of
health information.
(b) Procedures governing data registries and ways to streamline
the collection of data and reduce the burden of reporting
requirements applicable to providers of health care to improve
collaboration between providers of health care and public health
agencies in this State.
(c) The feasibility of including in the State Plan for Medicaid an
enhanced rate of reimbursement for providers of health care who
provide services in medically underserved areas and rural areas of
this State. The study must include, without limitation, a specific
determination of the feasibility of including in the State Plan an
enhanced rate of reimbursement for such providers for whom at
least half of their patients are enrolled in Medicare and Medicaid.
(d) Methods for increasing the amount of biotechnological and
medical research conducted in this State and fostering an
environment in this State conducive to the development of patents
for and the commercialization of medical and biotechnological
products. Methods considered by the study must include, without
limitation:
(1) Tax abatements for small and medium-sized medical and
biotechnology companies that start in or relocate to this State;
(2) Matching tax credits for investments in new medical and
biotechnology companies;
(3) The development of a public-private partnership to
establish a program to foster the growth of new medical and
biotechnology companies;
(4) Tax incentives for research, development and capital
investment in health care and biotechnology; and
(5) Sustainable funding models to support:
(I) The continued advancement of the medical sciences;
and
-
*SB419_R2*

– 33 –
(II) Programs for developing the health care workforce
that are aimed at improving outcomes for patients.
(e) The feasibility of including in the State Plan for Medicaid a
program to provide services through managed care to recipients of
Medicaid who are aged, blind or disabled.
2. The study described in paragraph (e) of subsection 1 must
include, without limitation, the consideration at a public meeting of
the Committee of the feasibility of including in the State Plan for
Medicaid a program described in that paragraph.
3. On or before February 1, 2025, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services shall submit a report of
its findings and any recommendations for legislation to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 83rd Session
of the Legislature.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Data registry” includes, without limitation:
(1) The system for the reporting of information on sickle cell
disease and its variants established pursuant to NRS 439.4976.
(2) The system for the reporting of information on lupus and
its variants established pursuant to NRS 439.4929.
(3) The system for the reporting of information on cancer
and other neoplasms established pursuant to NRS 457.230.
(b) “Medically underserved area” means an area designated as:
(1) A health professional shortage area for primary care by
the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. § 254e; or
(2) An area with a medically underserved population by the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 254b.
(c) “Natural persons index” means a database of health
information concerning natural persons who reside in this State to
be used by providers of health care and public health agencies in
this State to maintain and access accurate health information
concerning such natural persons.
(d) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A medical facility licensed pursuant to chapter 449 of
NRS;
(2) The holder of a permit to operate an ambulance, an air
ambulance or a vehicle of a fire-fighting agency pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS; or
(3) A provider of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031,
who is licensed pursuant to title 54 of NRS.
Sec. 59. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 60. 1. On or before July 1, 2023, the Director of the
Department shall convene an advisory group to advise the Director
-
*SB419_R2*

– 34 –
of the Department in the adoption of regulations pursuant to NRS
439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act. The advisory group
shall consist of:
(a) The following ex officio members:
(1) The Director of the Department;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy of the Department;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services of the Department;
(5) The Commissioner of Insurance;
(6) Each district health officer appointed pursuant to NRS
439.368 or 439.400;
(7) The Executive Officer of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program; and
(8) The Executive Director of the Silver State Health
Insurance Exchange; and
(b) The following members appointed by the Director:
(1) Representatives of third parties, as defined in NRS
439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act, that provide health
coverage in this State;
(2) Representatives of hospitals, as defined in NRS 449.012,
other medical facilities, as defined in NRS 449.0151, and facilities
for the dependent, as defined in NRS 449.0045;
(3) Representatives of consumers of health care;
(4) Representatives of labor organizations;
(5) Professionals in the field of information privacy and
security;
(6) Professionals in the field of health information
technology and the interoperability of health information;
(7) Representatives of community-based organizations
whose work relates to health information;
(8) Representatives of county and city health departments;
(9) Representatives of social services agencies; and
(10) Representatives of community-based organizations
whose work relates to social services.
2. Members appointed to the advisory group pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 serve at the pleasure of the Director of
the Department. If a vacancy occurs, the Director shall appoint a
person similarly qualified to replace that member.
3. Members of the advisory group serve without compensation
or per diem but are entitled to receive reimbursement for travel
expenses in the same amount provided for state officers and
employees generally.
-
*SB419_R2*

– 35 –
4. The Director of the Department shall serve as the Chair of
the advisory group.
5. A majority of the voting members of the advisory group
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority
of the members of a quorum present at any meeting is sufficient for
any official action taken by the advisory group.
6. Each member of the advisory group who is an officer or
employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must be
relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation
so that the officer or employee may prepare for and attend meetings
of the advisory group and perform any work necessary to carry out
the duties of the advisory group in the most timely manner
practicable. A state agency or political subdivision of this State shall
not require an officer or employee who is a member of the advisory
group to make up the time the officer or employee is absent from
work to carry out duties as a member of the advisory group or use
annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
7. The advisory group may establish subcommittees and
working groups consisting of members of the advisory group or
other persons to assist the advisory group in the performance of its
duties.
8. The advisory group shall advise the Department on the
development and implementation of the regulations adopted
pursuant to NRS 439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act.
9. The Department shall:
(a) On or before August 1, 2024, present at a meeting of the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human Services
concerning the progress of the Department in developing and
implementing the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 439.589, as
amended by section 6 of this act; and
(b) On or before December 31, 2024, submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 83rd Regular
Session of the Legislature a report concerning the progress of the
Department in developing and implementing the regulations adopted
pursuant to NRS 439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act.
10. As used in this section, “Department” means the
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 61. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 62. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 63. 1. Hospitals and physician group practices with
more than 20 employees shall comply with the provisions of
subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act,
on or before July 1, 2024.
2. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of sections 1, 6,
9, 17, 28, 29, 45, 47, 50 and 53 of this act:
-
*SB419_R2*

– 36 –
(a) Persons and entities subject to the provisions of subsection 4
of NRS 439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act, other than the
persons and entities described in paragraph (b) of this subsection
and subsection 1 of this section, are not required to comply with
those provisions until July 1, 2025.
(b) Physician group practices or other business entities
organized for the purpose of practicing a health care profession with
20 or fewer employees, including, without limitation, sole
proprietorships, are not required to comply with the provisions of
subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, as amended by section 6 of this act,
until January 1, 2030.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care profession” means any profession practiced by
providers of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031.
(b) “Hospital” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.012.
(c) “Physician group practice” means any business entity
organized for the purpose of the practice of medicine or osteopathic
medicine by more than one physician.
Sec. 64. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 65. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 66. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 67. 1. This section and sections 6.5, 7 and 8 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 18, 19, 20, 30 to 38, inclusive, 40, 41, 42, 57 to 60,
inclusive, 64 and 66 of this act become effective on July 1, 2023.
3. Sections 21 to 27, inclusive, 39, 43, 54.3, 54.6 and 61 of this
act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
4. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, 5, 6, 9 to 16, inclusive, 44, 45, 46,
55, 56 and 63 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
5. Sections 17, 28, 29, 47 to 54, inclusive, and 65 of this act
become effective:
-
*SB419_R2*

– 37 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
6. Sections 4.5 and 62 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
7. Sections 31 to 38, inclusive, of this act expire by limitation
on July 1, 2053.
8. Section 60 of this act expires by limitation on January 1,
2025.
H
-
*SB419_R2*